Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.145.901

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 13.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 6, 2011].

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 13.]